sv: Styrkeklass: Extra kraftig (industriell); Kraftig; Lätt; Standard; Övrigt
it: Grado di resistenza: Extra resistente (industriale); Alta resistenza; Bassa resistenza; Resistenza standard; Altro
fr: Classe de résistance: Usage ultra-intensif (industriel); Usage intensif; Usage léger; Usage standard; Autre
da: Styrkegrad: Ekstra kraftig (industriel); Kraftig; Let; Standard; Andet
el: Κατηγορία αντοχής: Υπερβαρέως τύπου (βιομηχανικό); Βαρέως τύπου; Ελαφρού τύπου; Κανονικού τύπου; Άλλο
hr-HR: Razred čvrstoće: Iznimno otporno (industrijsko); Jako otporno; Za lakša opterećenja; Standardna otpornost; Ostalo
lt-LT: Stiprumo klasė: Ypač atsparus (pramoninis); Atsparus; Mažo atsparumo; Standartinio atsparumo; Kita
en: Strength grade: Extra heavy-duty (industrial); Heavy-duty; Light-duty; Standard-duty; Other
zh-CN: 强度等级: 特重型（工业级）; 重型; 轻型; 标准型; 其他
nb: Styrkegrad: Ekstra kraftig (industriell); Kraftig; Lett bruk; Standard bruk; Annet
pl: Klasa wytrzymałości: Bardzo duża wytrzymałość (przemysłowa); O dużej wytrzymałości; O lekkiej wytrzymałości; O standardowej wytrzymałości; Inne
tr: Mukavemet derecesi: Ekstra ağır hizmet (endüstriyel); Ağır hizmet; Hafif hizmet; Standart hizmet; Diğer
sl-SI: Kakovostni razred trdnosti: Zelo visoka nosilnost (industrijsko); Visoka nosilnost; Nizka nosilnost; Standardna nosilnost; Drugo
vi: Cấp độ bền: Chịu tải cực cao (công nghiệp); Chịu tải cao; Chịu tải nhẹ; Chịu tải tiêu chuẩn; Khác
es: Grado de resistencia: Extra resistente (industrial); Alta resistencia; Baja resistencia; Resistencia estándar; Otro
pt-PT: Grau de resistência: Muito resistente (industrial); Resistente; Uso ligeiro; Uso padrão; Outro
nl: Sterktegraad: Extra zwaar (industrieel); Heavy-duty; Licht gebruik; Standaardgebruik; Overig
pt-BR: Resistência grau: Uso extra pesado (industrial); Uso pesado (Heavy-duty); Uso leve; Uso padrão; Outro
zh-TW: 強度等級: 特重型 (工業用); 重型; 輕型; 標準型; 其他
ja: 強度等級: 超高耐久 (工業用); 高耐久; 軽作業用; 標準耐久; その他
cs: Stupeň pevnosti: Pro extra velkou zátěž (průmyslové); Pro velkou zátěž; Pro malou zátěž; Pro standardní zátěž; Jiné
sk-SK: Stupeň pevnosti: Extra vysoká záťaž (priemyselné); Vysoká záťaž; Nízka záťaž; Štandardná záťaž; Iné
hu: Teherbírási fokozat: Extra nagy teherbírású (ipari); Nagy teherbírású; Kis teherbírású; Normál teherbírású; Egyéb
fi: Lujuusluokka: Erittäin raskaaseen käyttöön (teollinen); Raskaaseen käyttöön; Kevyeen käyttöön; Normaaliin käyttöön; Muu
ru: Класс прочности: Сверхпрочные (промышленные); Повышенной прочности; Легкие; Стандартной прочности; Другое
th: ระดับความแข็งแรง: รับงานหนักพิเศษ (อุตสาหกรรม); รับงานหนัก; รับงานเบา; รับงานมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
ko: 강도 등급: 초고강도(산업용); 고강도; 저강도; 표준 강도; 기타
bg-BG: Клас на здравина: Изключително издръжлив (индустриален); Издръжлив; За леко натоварване; За стандартно натоварване; Друго
de: Festigkeitsklasse: Extra strapazierfähig (Industrie); Strapazierfähig; Leichte Beanspruchung; Normale Beanspruchung; Andere
ro-RO: Grad de rezistență: Regim extra greu (industrial); Regim greu; Regim ușor; Regim standard; Altele